Colorado, session 2026A, SB123.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 35-50-115.5 as
follows:
35-50-115.5. Ventilation shutdown - prohibition - short title -
legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS SECTION IS THE "MODERNIZING
DEPOPULATION ACT".
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY:
(a) FINDS THAT WHEN AN OWNER OF POULTRY DEPOPULATES THEIR
ENTIRE FLOCK OF POULTRY IN RESPONSE TO A DISEASE, THE OWNER MUST
CARRY OUT THE DEPOPULATION AS HUMANELY AS POSSIBLE; AND
(b) OPPOSES THE USE OF VENTILATION SHUTDOWN AND
VENTILATION SHUTDOWN PLUS, BOTH OF WHICH KILL POULTRY BY
GRADUALLY INDUCING FATAL HYPERTHERMIA OR HEAT STROKE, IN FAVOR
OF HIGHER WELFARE DEPOPULATION METHODS.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "DEPOPULATION" MEANS THE MASS DESTRUCTION OF POULTRY
FOR DISEASE CONTROL PURPOSES.
(b) "POULTRY" MEANS ANY DOMESTICATED BIRD, INCLUDING
CHICKENS, TURKEYS, DUCKS, GEESE, GUINEAS, SQUABS, OR PHEASANTS.
(c) "VENTILATION SHUTDOWN" MEANS A METHOD OF
DEPOPULATION THAT INVOLVES SEALING A BUILDING IN WHICH POULTRY
ARE CONFINED, SHUTTING INLETS, AND TURNING OFF FANS OR
VENTILATION SYSTEMS IN ORDER TO RAISE THE TEMPERATURE IN THE
BUILDING AND INDUCE DEATH OF THE POULTRY THROUGH FATAL
-2- SB26-123

HYPERTHERMIA OR HEAT STROKE.
(d) "VENTILATION SHUTDOWN PLUS" MEANS THE USE OF
VENTILATION SHUTDOWN WITH ADDITIONAL HEAT SOURCES, HUMIDITY, OR
STEAM IN ORDER TO MORE RAPIDLY RAISE THE TEMPERATURE IN THE
BUILDING AND INDUCE DEATH OF POULTRY THROUGH FATAL
HYPERTHERMIA OR HEAT STROKE.
(4) IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR:
(a) AN OWNER OF POULTRY, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, TO USE
VENTILATION SHUTDOWN OR VENTILATION SHUTDOWN PLUS ON THE
OWNER'S POULTRY; AND
(b) AN AGENT OR REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT OR
COMMISSION TO ORDER, APPROVE, AUTHORIZE, OR OTHERWISE ASSIST AN
OWNER OF POULTRY TO USE VENTILATION SHUTDOWN OR VENTILATION
SHUTDOWN PLUS ON THE OWNER'S POULTRY.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-50-114, amend
(4)(j) and (4)(k); and add (4)(l) as follows:
35-50-114. Indemnification of livestock owners - diseased
livestock indemnity fund - repeal.
(4) No indemnity shall be paid when:
(j) The destruction order was not complied with within the
specified time period; or
(k) The owner attempted to unlawfully or improperly obtain
indemnity funds; OR
(l) THE OWNER VIOLATED SECTION 35-50-115.5.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect July 1, 2029; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this
-3- SB26-123

act or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period
after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect July 1, 2029, or on the date of the official declaration of the vote
thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
-4- SB26-123